Maryland, session 2025, HB1095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
25–102.
This title applies only in Montgomery County.
25–1002.
(a) There is a beauty salon AND BARBERSHOP beer [and], wine, AND LIQUOR
license.
(b) The Board may issue the license to a holder of:
– 1 –

Ch. 836 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) a beauty salon permit issued under § 5–501 of the Business Occupations
and Professions Article; OR
(2) A BARBERSHOP PERMIT ISSUED UNDER § 4–501 OF THE BUSINESS
OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE.
(c) The license authorizes the license holder to provide not more than 12 OUNCES
OF BEER, 5 ounces of [beer or] wine [by the glass], OR 1.7 OUNCES OF LIQUOR for
on–premises consumption by a beauty salon OR BARBERSHOP customer:
(1) when the customer is provided a cosmetology service under § 5–101(n)
TITLE 5 of the Business Occupations and Professions Article OR A BARBERING SERVICE
UNDER TITLE 4 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE; or
(2) while the customer is attending a fund–raising event at the beauty
salon OR BARBERSHOP for which the County Department of Permitting Services has
issued a permit.
(d) The license may not be transferred to another location.
(e) The license holder may provide beer [and], wine, AND LIQUOR during normal
business hours but not later than 9 p.m.
(f) An establishment for which the license is issued is subject to the alcohol
awareness training requirements under § 4–505 of this article.
(g) The annual license fee is $100.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –